Washington statutes.
RCW 18.51.067

License suspension—Noncompliance with support order—Reissuance.

The department shall immediately suspend the license of a person who has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services, division of [child] support, as a person who is not in compliance with a child support order or a *residential or visitation order. If the person has continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the license shall be automatic upon the department's receipt of a release issued by the division of child support stating that the person is in compliance with the order.

[ 1997 c 58 s 824.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: 1997 c 58 s 886 requiring a court to order certification of noncompliance with residential provisions of a court-ordered parenting plan was vetoed. Provisions ordering the department of social and health services to certify a responsible parent based on a court order to certify for noncompliance with residential provisions of a parenting plan were vetoed. See RCW 74.20A.320.

Short title—Part headings, captions, table of contents not law—Exemptions and waivers from federal law—Conflict with federal requirements—Severability—1997 c 58: See RCW 74.08A.900 through 74.08A.904.

Effective dates—Intent—1997 c 58: See notes following RCW 74.20A.320.